Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.466

Washington achieving a better life experience program—Established—Governing board—Administrative support—Colocation with developmental disabilities endowment governing board—Advisory committees—Interagency agreements—Limited liability.

The Washington achieving a better life experience program is established and the governing board is authorized to design and administer the Washington achieving a better life experience program in the best interests of eligible individuals. To the extent funds are appropriated for this purpose, the director of the department shall provide staff and administrative support to the governing board. The department shall consult with the governing board regarding the staffing and administrative support needs before selecting any staff pursuant to this section. To the extent practicable, the Washington achieving a better life experience program must be colocated with the developmental disabilities endowment governing board established under this chapter.

(1) The governing board shall consist of seven members as follows:

(a) The state treasurer or his or her designee;

(b) The program director for the committee on advanced tuition payment established in RCW 28B.95.020;

(c) The director of the office of financial management or his or her designee; and

(d) Four members with demonstrated financial, legal, or disability program experience, appointed by the governor.

(2) The board shall select the chair of the board from among the seven board members identified in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) Members of the board who are appointed by the governor shall serve four-year terms and may be appointed for successive four-year terms at the discretion of the governor. The governor may stagger the terms of the appointed members.

(4) Members of the board must be compensated for their service under RCW 43.03.240 and must be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(5) The board shall meet periodically as specified by the chair, or a majority of the board, and may allow members to participate in meetings remotely.

(6) The board may appoint advisory committees to support the design or administration of the Washington achieving a better life experience program. Individuals serving on advisory committees must serve staggered terms and may be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided in RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060, but may not be compensated for their service.

(7) The board may execute interagency agreements that authorize other state agencies such as the committee on advanced tuition payment established in RCW 28B.95.020 to perform administrative functions necessary to carry out the Washington achieving a better life experience program.

(8) Members of the governing board and the state investment board shall not be considered an insurer of the funds or assets of the Washington achieving a better life experience program account or the individual program accounts. Neither of these two boards are liable for the action or inaction of the other.

(9) Members of the governing board and the state investment board are not liable to the state, to the fund, or to any other person as a result of their activities as members, whether ministerial or discretionary, except for willful dishonesty or intentional violations of law. The department and the state investment board may purchase liability insurance for members.

[ 2016 c 39 s 4.]